apertium-kaz-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON POSSESSION-ENDINGS  ! P_2
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GEN-POS-PX12SG ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GEN-POS-PX12SG ; 
%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GEN-POS ; 
%<px3sg%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з GEN-POS ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р GEN-POS ; 
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GEN-POS ;
%<px3pl%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON EXI

%<adj%>: ATTR ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON SUBST-COMMON

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
POSSESSION ;

!LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON
!
!!%<n%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ADJ ;  ! Any noun can be made into an adjective like this, though it's basically derivation
!! %<attr%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ATTR ;

LEXICON N-INFL-SG  ! nouns with no/irregular plural

!%<n%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<attr%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ATTR ;
%<n%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON N-INFL      ! Nouns that have a LUU attributive form

%<n%>%<attr%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ATTR ;
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON N-INFL-KI   ! Nouns that have a KI attributive form

%<n%>: KI ;
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

! LEXICON N-INFL-NO-ATTR  ! Used for nouns that have irregular <attr> forms
! 
! %<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;
! 
! LEXICON N-INFL-JUST-KI  ! Used for nouns that have irregular KI forms
! 
! %<n%>: KI ;

LEXICON N-INFL-NKI

%<n%>:%{I%}н KI ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>:%{I%}ң KI ; 
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

POSSESSION ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-COG-F

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}к ADJ-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ACR

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NAT
! Nationalities

ADJ ;             ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]"
N-INFL ;          ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
%>ч%{A%} ADV ;    ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
%>ч%{A%} ADV ;    ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish"
%>ч%{A%} N-INFL ; ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

%<pst%>: # ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к # ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к # ;        ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ADJ-COMMON

%<adj%>%<pst%>: # ;
! %<n%>: POSSESSION ;  ! all adjectives can be used as nouns
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;
! %<n%>: N-INFL ;  ! all adjectives can be used as nouns

LEXICON DAGI

!!! ADJ-COMMON ;  !!!! ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this instead of CASES
!%<n%>: CASES ;
!! ADJ-COMMON ;  !!!! ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this instead of N-INFL
!!%<n%>: N-INFL ;
!%<adj%>%<pst%>: # ;
!# ;

%<attr%>: # ;
!%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;  ! This is instead of the line below
%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;  ! Use/Circ  !! FIXME: when we go recursie, uncomment


LEXICON V-ADJ

! ADJ-COMMON ; 
! %<pst%>:  # ; 
! # ;
ATTR ; 
%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ATTR

# ;
V-CLIT ;
!ADJ-LEVELS ; ! In theory, there can be <pst> and <comp> readings, but depends what for

LEXICON ADJ

ADJ-COMMON ; 
%<adj%>: ADJ-LEVELS ; 
%<adj%>%<advl%>: ADVL ;
%<adj%>: V-PERS-COP ;

! LEXICON ADJ-ORD
! 
! %<adj%>%<ord%>: # ;
! %<adj%>%<ord%>%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;
! 
! LEXICON ADJ-KI
!
! %<attr%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} ADJ-COMMON ;

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} ATTR ;

LEXICON ADV-KI

%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-ABL

ADV ;
ADV-KI ;
ADV-ABL ; 

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
ADV-KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-ABL

ADV ;
ADV-ABL ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-ABL-REG

ADV ;
ADV-ABL-REG ;

LEXICON ADV-ABL

%<adv%>%<abl%>:%>т%{A%}н PRED ;

LEXICON ADV-ABL-REG

%<adv%>%<abl%>:%>д%{A%}н PRED ;

LEXICON ADVL

# ;
V-CLIT ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: ADVL ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON POST-DECL

%<post%>: POSSESSION ; 
%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON PART 

%<part%>: # ;
%<part%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PART-PERS-COP

%<part%>: V-PERS-COP ;

! LEXICON PART-PERS-PAST 
! 
! %<part%>: V-PERS-PAST ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON NumeralList

%0 NumeralLoop ;
1 NumeralLoop ;
2 NumeralLoop ;
3 NumeralLoop ;
4 NumeralLoop ;
5 NumeralLoop ;
6 NumeralLoop ;
7 NumeralLoop ;
8 NumeralLoop ;
9 NumeralLoop ;
%% NumeralLoop ;

LEXICON NumeralLoop
NumeralList ;
%. NumeralList  ;
%, NumeralList  ;
%. NUM ; ! Dir/RL
%, NUM ; ! Dir/RL
%%%<num%>:%% CASES ;
!Num ;
NUM ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>: CASES ;


LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;


LEXICON NUM-ONE

% жүз:% жүз NUM ; ! "one hundred"
% миң:% миң NUM ; ! "one thousand"
% миллион:% миллион NUM ; ! "one million"
% миллиард:% миллиард NUM ; ! "one billion"

NUM-COMMON ;


LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: POSSESSION ;
! %<num%>%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й POSSESSION ;  ! WTF is this?
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} ADVL ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ;  ! yes, they can be plural


LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бул PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бу PRED ;   ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мунун # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:муну # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:буга # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мында PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мындан PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мындай PRED ;  

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мындагы DAGI ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:муну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бу%>л%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-OSOL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;  ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нун # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ну # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:го # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндо PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндон PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндой PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндогу DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндуктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-USUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;  ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нун # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ну # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:га # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндан PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндай PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндагы DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндуктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM-AL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нын # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:га # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндан PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндай PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндагы DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндыктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ны POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-TIGIL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;   ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нин # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ни # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:ге # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нде PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:нден PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:нндей PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндеги DAGI ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ни POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON Numerals 
эки NUM-ONE ; ! "two"
үч NUM-ONE ; ! "three"
төрт NUM-ONE ; ! "four"
беш NUM-ONE ; ! "five"
жети NUM-ONE ; ! "seven"
тогуз NUM-ONE ; ! "nine"
отуз:отуз NUM ; ! "thirty"
элүү:элүү NUM ; ! "fifty"
токсон:токсон NUM ; ! "ninety"
миллиард:миллиард NUM ; ! "one billion"
триллион:триллион NUM ;
он% беш:он% беш NUM ;
III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
LEXICON NounStems
бала N-INFL-SG ; ! "child"
бет:бет N-INFL ; ! "page, face"
жандарм:жандарм N-INFL ; 
автоматизм:автоматизм N-INFL ; 
заман:заман N-INFL ; 
бийлик:бийлик N-INFL ; 
аба% ырайы:аба% ырай N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! "weather"   ! FIXME: is ырай<px3>, so takes cases after <px3>
мыйзам:мыйзам N-INFL ;
оң:оң N-INFL ;
кыш N-INFL-KI ; ! "winter"/"wintery"
жаз N-INFL-KI ; ! "spring"/"spring-time"
жай N-INFL-KI ; ! "summer"/"summery"
соң N-INFL-KI ; ! "end"/"final"
сырт N-INFL-KI ; ! "outside"/"outer"
төмөн N-INFL-KI ; ! "bottom"/"following/below"
күн N-INFL-KI ; ! "day"
аст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "bottom", "lower"
алд N-INFL-NKI ; ! "front/forward", "forward"
үст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "top", "upper"
орто N-INFL-NKI ; ! "middle/center", "central"
арт N-INFL-NKI ; ! "back", "rear"
LEXICON PropernounStems
Фергана NP-TOP ;
Кыргыз% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ;
Туркестан% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Казак% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Өзбек% ССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Украина% ССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Тажик% ССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Каракалпак% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Азербайжан NP-TOP ; ! ""
Гватемала NP-TOP ; ! ""
Мадагаскар NP-TOP ; ! "Madagascar"
Ысык%-Көл NP-TOP ; ! ""
Учкун NP-TOP ;
ЕБ NP-TOP-ACR ;
Сокулук NP-TOP ;
Кыргызмамбас NP-ORG ; ! ""
Киргизгосиздат NP-ORG ; ! "" (ru)
Ленинчил NP-ORG ; ! "" 
Кыргызокуупедмамбас NP-ORG ; ! "Kyrgyz Pedagogical State Press"
Серб% Аскери NP-ORG ;
КМУ NP-ORG ;
Киргизучпедгиз NP-ORG ;
Нооруз NP-AL ; ! ""
Супер% Галеб NP-AL ;
Галеб NP-AL ;
Супер NP-AL ;
Г4 NP-AL ; ! ""
Газел NP-AL ; ! ""
Супер% Г4 NP-AL ; ! "" 
Керим NP-ANT-M ;
Алмазбек NP-ANT-M ;
Үсөн NP-ANT-M ;
Асан NP-ANT-M ;
Мухаммед NP-ANT-M ;
Арнольд NP-ANT-M ;
Петир NP-ANT-M ; ! "Peter"
София NP-ANT-F ; ! "Sofija"
Анна NP-ANT-F ;
Обо NP-ANT-F ; ! "Eve"
Сарра NP-ANT-F ; ! "Sarah"  ! FIXME: check
Лия NP-ANT-F ; ! "Leah"
Айгүл NP-ANT-F ;
Айша NP-ANT-F ;
Абдыкадыров NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Байтемиров NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Жирков NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Көбөнов NP-COG-M ; ! ""
народов NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Сатылганов NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Осмоналиев NP-COG-M ;
Орузбаева NP-COG-F ;
Отунбаева NP-COG-F ;
Бен Ладен NP-COG-MF ;
Грбич NP-COG-MF ;
Жовижевич NP-COG-MF ;
Комсич NP-COG-MF ;
Медведев NP-COG-MF ;
Обренович NP-COG-MF ;
Терзич NP-COG-MF ;
LEXICON AdjecStems
ортопедиялык:ортопедиялык ADJ ; 
тоголок:тоголок ADJ ; 
өндүргүч:өндүргүч ADJ ;
естетикалык:естетикалык ADJ ;
таанымал:таанымал ADJ ;
жантык:жантык ADJ ;
запас:запас ADJ ;
бая ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "~former"
келер ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "coming/future"
алгач ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! KI: "first" ADV: "at first; first of all"
азыр ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "present"
быйыл ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "this year's"
илгери:илгер ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "ancient"
илгери:илгер ADV-WITH-ABL ; ! "ancient"
эми ADV-WITH-ABL ;
эми:эм ADV-KI ; ! "next/soon-to-be"
ары ADV-ABL ; ! "further away"           ! Dir/LR
ары ADV-WITH-ABL-REG ; ! "further away"
ары:ар ADV-KI ; ! "further away"
нары ADV-ABL ; ! "futher away"           ! Dir/LR
нары ADV-WITH-ABL-REG ; ! "futher away"
нары:нар ADV-KI ; ! "futher away"
бери ADV-ABL ; ! "nearer"                ! Dir/LR
бери ADV-WITH-ABL-REG ; ! "nearer"
бери:бер ADV-KI ; ! "nearer"
эртең% менен ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "morning
эртең% менен ADV-ABL-REG ; ! "morning      ! Dir/LR
кечеки ADJ-COMMON ; ! "yesterday's"
кечөөкү ADJ-COMMON ; ! "yesterday's"
кечээки ADJ-COMMON ; ! "yesterday's"
кечеги ADJ-COMMON ; ! "yesterday's"
кечөөгү ADJ-COMMON ; ! "yesterday's"
кечээги ADJ-COMMON ; ! "yesterday's"
LEXICON AdvStems
эмнеге ADV-ITG ; ! "why"
качан ADV-ITG ; ! "when"
кандай ADV-ITG ; ! "how"
кандайча ADV-ITG ; ! "howso"
кайда:кай%<loc%> ADV-ITG ; ! "where"
каршы ADV ; 
дагы% эле ADV ; ! FIXME: compositional
чындыгында ADV ; ! FIXME: compositional
кайра ADV ; 
көчүрмө% аркылуу ADV ;
ачык% эле ADV ;
LEXICON VerbStems
бар EXI ;
жок EXI ;
